Maryland, session 2025, SB0225.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Labor and Employment
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0225*

SENATE BILL 225
8.3–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Application year” means the 12–month period beginning on the Sunday of
the calendar week [for which benefits are approved] IN WHICH LEAVE UNDER THIS TITLE
BEGINS.
(d) “Covered employee” means an employee who has worked at least 680 hours
performing services under employment located in the State over the four most recently
completed calendar quarters for which quarterly reports have been required immediately
preceding the date on which leave is to begin.
(e) “Covered individual” means a covered employee or a self–employed individual
who elects to participate in the Program under § 8.3–201 of this title.
8.3–201.
(a) In this section, “self–employed individual” includes an individual [that] WHO:
(1) is the sole owner of a sole proprietorship, limited liability company, C
corporation, or S corporation; and
(2) is the only individual employed by the sole proprietorship, limited
liability company, C corporation, or S corporation.
(b) [(1)] A self–employed individual who is a resident of the State may elect to
participate in the Program [by filing a written notice of election with the Secretary] in
accordance with regulations adopted by the Secretary UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS
SECTION.
[(2) An election made under paragraph (1) of this subsection becomes
effective on the date the written notice is filed.
(c) (1) If a self–employed individual elects to participate in the Program
under subsection (b) of this section, the individual shall participate for an initial period
of not less than 3 years.
(2) Once the initial participation period expires, the self–employed
individual may renew participation in the Program for a period of not less than 1 year.
(3) If the self–employed individual does not wish to renew participation in
the Program under paragraph (2) of this subsection, within 30 days before the participation
period expires, the self–employed individual shall notify the Secretary in writing of the
self–employed individual’s withdrawal from the Program.

SENATE BILL 225 3
(d) During the period a self–employed individual participates in the Program, the
self–employed individual shall pay the contribution required under § 8.3–601 of this title.]
(C) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2027, THE SECRETARY SHALL ADOPT
REGULATIONS THAT ESTABLISH AN OPTIONAL SELF–EMPLOYED ENROLLMENT
PROGRAM AND INCLUDE:
(1) CONTRIBUTION AMOUNTS;
(2) BENEFIT AMOUNTS; AND
(3) ENROLLMENT PROCEDURES.
8.3–601.
(a) (1) (I) Beginning July 1, 2025, each employee of an employer[,] AND
each employer with 15 or more employees[, and each self–employed individual
participating in the Program] shall contribute to the Fund.
[(2)] (II) The total rate of contribution established under this section FOR
EMPLOYEES AND EMPLOYERS DESCRIBED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH:
[(i)] 1. may not exceed 1.2% of an employee’s wages; and
[(ii)] 2. shall be applied to all wages up to and including the Social
Security wage base.
(2) EACH SELF–EMPLOYED INDIVIDUAL PARTICIPATING IN THE
PROGRAM SHALL CONTRIBUTE TO THE FUND IN ACCORDANCE WITH REGULATIONS
ADOPTED UNDER § 8.3–201(C) OF THIS TITLE.
(b) (1) Subject to subsection [(a)(2)] (A)(1)(II) of this section, on or before
February 1, 2025, the Secretary shall set the total rate of contribution based on available
cost analyses of the Program.
(2) The rate set under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be in effect for
the period from July 1, 2025, to June 30, 2026, both inclusive.
(c) (1) On or before November 15 each year, beginning in 2026, the Secretary
shall conduct a cost analysis of the Program that is focused on the cost of maintaining
solvency and paying benefits to covered individuals that will be used to determine the
appropriate total rate of contribution to the Fund.
(2) On or before November 15 each year, the Secretary shall report the

SENATE BILL 225
results of the cost analysis to the Senate Finance Committee, the House Economic Matters
Committee, and the Joint Committee on Administrative, Executive, and Legislative Review
in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article.
(d) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection and subsection [(a)(2)]
(A)(1)(II) of this section, on or before February 1 each year, beginning in 2026, the
Secretary shall set the total rate of contribution that will be in effect for the 12–month
period beginning on the immediately following July 1.
(2) The rate set under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be based on
the cost analysis required under subsection (c) of this section.
(e) (1) (i) Except as otherwise provided in this section, each employer of 15
or more employees shall contribute an amount equal to 50% of the total rate of contribution
for each employee.
(ii) Except as otherwise provided in this section, each employee of an
employer shall contribute an amount equal to 50% of the total rate of contribution.
(2) (i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, the
employer of the employee shall deduct the employee’s required contribution from the wages
of the employee.
(ii) 1. An employer may elect to pay all or a portion of the
required employee contributions in whole or in part.
2. If the employer of an employee elects to pay a portion of
the employee’s required contribution, the employer:
A. may deduct an amount that is less than 50% of the rate of
contribution required from the wages of the employee; and
B. shall notify employees of the rate of contribution set for
employees under subsection (d)(1) of this section and the portion of that amount that the
employer is electing to pay.
[(f) Each self–employed individual participating in the Program shall:
(1) pay contributions during each year that the self–employed individual
participates in the Program; and
(2) contribute an amount equal to the total rate of contribution set under
subsection (d) of this section.]
[(g)] (F) (1) The Maryland Department of Health shall reimburse each:

SENATE BILL 225 5
(i) community provider that is required to be licensed or certified
under Title 7 of the Health – General Article for 100% of the employer contribution required
under subsection (e) of this section for employees who manage or provide services under
Title 7 of the Health – General Article;
(ii) community provider that is required to be licensed or certified
under Title 7.5 of the Health – General Article for a percentage of the employer contribution
required under subsection (e) of this section for employees who manage or provide services
under Title 7.5 of the Health – General Article that is equal to the percentage of revenue
that is attributable to federal and State Medicaid funding and any other State funding
received by the community provider for the services during the period covered by the
reimbursement; or
(iii) provider, as defined in § 16–201.4 of the Health – General Article,
for a percentage of the employer contribution required under subsection (e) of this section
for employees who manage or provide services described in § 16–201.4(a) of the Health –
General Article that is equal to the percentage of revenue attributable to federal and State
Medicaid funding and any other State funding received by the provider for the services
during the period covered by the reimbursement.
(2) The Maryland Department of Health shall make the reimbursements
required under paragraph (1) of this subsection at least quarterly.
(3) To receive reimbursement under paragraph (1) of this subsection, a
provider shall provide to the Maryland Department of Health any information necessary to
carry out this subsection in the form and manner required by the Maryland Department of
Health.
8.3–703.
(a) For the purposes of this section:
(1) the covered [individual’s] EMPLOYEE’S average weekly wage shall be
calculated as the total wages received by the covered [individual] EMPLOYEE in the
highest of the previous four completed calendar quarters for which quarterly reports have
been required, divided by 13; and
(2) the State average weekly wage shall be the wage calculated under §
9–603 of this article.
(b) (1) Subject to paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection, the weekly benefit
amount payable to a covered [individual] EMPLOYEE under this title shall be:
(i) if the covered [individual’s] EMPLOYEE’S average weekly wage
is 65% or less of the State average weekly wage, 90% of the covered [individual’s]
EMPLOYEE’S average weekly wage; or

SENATE BILL 225
(ii) if the covered [individual’s] EMPLOYEE’S average weekly wage
is greater than 65% of the State average weekly wage, the sum of:
1. 90% of the covered [individual’s] EMPLOYEE’S average
weekly wage up to 65% of the State average weekly wage; and
2. 50% of the covered [individual’s] EMPLOYEE’S average
weekly wage that is greater than 65% of the State average weekly wage.
(2) The benefit paid under this title and any additional paid leave cannot
total more than 100% of the covered [individual’s] EMPLOYEE’S average weekly wage.
(3) The weekly benefit amount payable under paragraph (1) of this
subsection:
(i) shall be at least $50; and
(ii) may not exceed:
1. for the 6–month period beginning July 1, 2026, $1,000; and
2. for the 12–month period beginning January 1, 2027, and
each subsequent 12–month period, the amount determined and announced by the Secretary
under paragraph (4) of this subsection.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025.